Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.370

General contractor/construction manager procedure—Maximum allowable construction cost.

(1) The maximum allowable construction cost shall be used to establish a total contract cost for which the general contractor/construction manager shall provide a performance and payment bond. The maximum allowable construction cost shall be negotiated between the public body and the selected firm when the construction documents and specifications are at least ninety percent complete.

(2) Major bid packages may be bid in accordance with RCW 39.10.380 before agreement on the maximum allowable construction cost between the public body and the selected general contractor/construction manager. The general contractor/construction manager may issue an intent to award to the responsible bidder submitting the lowest responsive bid.

(3) The public body may, at its option, authorize the general contractor/construction manager to proceed with the bidding and award of bid packages and construction before receipt of complete project plans and specifications. Any contracts awarded under this subsection shall be incorporated in the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost.

(4) The total contract cost includes the fixed amount for the detailed specified general conditions work, the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, the negotiated support services, and the percent fee on the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost. Unless portions or all are converted to lump sum, negotiated support services shall be treated as a contractual allowance, subject to reconciliation at the conclusion of work.

(5) If the public body is unable to negotiate a satisfactory maximum allowable construction cost with the firm selected that the public body determines to be fair, reasonable, and within the available funds, negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated and the public body shall negotiate with the next highest scored firm and continue until an agreement is reached or the process is terminated.

(6) If the maximum allowable construction cost varies more than 15 percent from the bid estimated maximum allowable construction cost due to requested and approved changes in the scope by the public body, the percent fee shall be renegotiated.

[ 2021 c 230 s 10; 2014 c 42 s 6; 2007 c 494 s 304.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2021 c 230: See note following RCW 39.10.210.